Utah statutes.
57-13a-102.   Prescriptive easement for water conveyance.
(1) A prescriptive easement may be established if a water user has maintained
a water conveyance for a period of 20 years during which the use has been:
(a)  continuous;
(b)  open and notorious; and
(c)  adverse.
(2)  If Subsections (1)(a) and (b) are established, there is a rebuttable
presumption that the use has been adverse.
